Wyoming, session 2025, HB0170.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-19-123(a)(intro) and (i) and
17-23-118(a)(i) are amended to read:

17-19-123. Effective date of document.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section and W.S. 17-19-124(c), a document accepted for
filing under W.S. 17-19-120 is effective:
HB0170

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0656

(i) At the time of received for filing, on the
date it is filed, as evidenced by the secretary of state's
endorsement on the original document; or

17-23-118. Effective time and date of document.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, a document accepted for filing is effective:

(i) At the time of received for filing, on the
date it is filed, as evidenced by the secretary of state's
date and time endorsement on the original document; or

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0170